District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.07

Prohibition against retaliation.

(a)

A tenant may provide information to the Mayor concerning deteriorated paint or lead-based paint hazards within a property or elevated blood levels of a person at risk.

(b)

The provision of information in subsection (a) of this section shall be considered tenant rights.

History

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 8, 56 DCR 1596